Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 10
RESPONSIBLE ALCOHOL BEVERAGE VENDOR ACT

44-3-1001. Short title.

The short title of this part 10 is the "Responsible Alcohol Beverage Vendor Act".

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1066, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-1001 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-1002. Responsible vendors - standards.

To be a responsible alcohol beverage vendor, a vendor shall comply with the server and seller training program established by the director of the liquor enforcement division of the department.

The director of the liquor enforcement division shall set standards for compliance with the server and seller training program. When creating standards, the director shall consider input from local and state government, the alcohol beverage industry, and any other state or national seller and server programs.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1066, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-1002 as it existed prior to 2018.